Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB760.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 743. Radon Testing.--(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and thereafter as provided under this section : (1) Each existing school building shall be tested for radon gas.(2) If the test result is at least four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building shall be mitigated and retested until the radon levels are less than four (4) picocuries per liter of air.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The following shall apply to the initial testing of a school building's radon gas levels:(1) The initial testing of a school building's radon gas levels shall occur within one (1) year of the effective date of this clause or within one (1) year of completion of the building's construction, whichever is later . (2) If the testing of a school building's radon gas levels does not identify any radon gas levels at or above four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building must be retested every five (5) years or when the school building receives major structural, foundational or HVAC renovations or repairs, whichever is sooner.(3) If the testing of a school building's radon gas levels identifies any radon gas levels at or above four (4) picocuries per liter, the school building must be retested every two (2) years.(c) Radon gas testing shall be performed in accordance with the version of ANSI-AARST MA-MFLB Protocol for Conducting Measurements of Radon and Radon Decay Products in Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use Buildings in effect on the effective date of this subsection.(d) Radon gas testing shall be performed by an individual who is certified under the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.238, No.43), known as the "Radon Certification Act."(e) The following shall apply to radon gas mitigation:(1) If radon gas testing results for a room or occupied area in a school building indicate that the radon level is at least four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building shall be mitigated and retested until the radon levels are less than four (4) picocuries per liter of air.20250SB0760PN0816 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Radon gas mitigation shall be performed by an individual who is certified under the "Radon Certification Act" by the Department of Environmental Protection. Retesting of mitigated buildings shall be performed as provided under clause (1) and every two (2) years thereafter by an individual who is certified under the "Radon Certification Act" by the Department of Environmental Protection.(3) (i) Operation, maintenance and monitoring of the radon gas mitigation system shall comply with the radon mitigation standards provided under the current version of the ANSI-AARST SGM-MFLB Soil Gas Mitigation Standards for Existing Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use Buildings in effect on the effective date of this subclause.(ii) Radon gas mitigation system installations shall be completed within six (6) months of confirmatory radon gas testing.(f) Initial radon testing results, mitigation plans and radon testing results conducted after radon mitigation shall be reported within sixty (60) days after the information has been received by the school entity as follows:(1) By presentation to the governing body of a school entity at a public meeting of the governing body of a school entity.(2) By communication by the governing body of a school entity to the parents' organization, if one exists.(3) By communication by the governing body of a school entity to the teachers' union or other employe organization.(4) By posting on the school district's publicly accessible Internet website and social media.(5) By submitting a report to the Radon Division of the Bureau of Radiation Protection of the Department of 20250SB0760PN0816 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Environmental Protection, the State Board of Education, the Department of Education and the county health department.(g) Each new school building shall be built using radon-resistant new construction techniques according to the version of the ANSI-AARST CC-1000: Soil Gas Control Systems in New Construction of Buildings in effect on the effective date of this subsection . (h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employe organization." As defined in section 1101-A."Governing body of a school entity." The board of school directors of a school district or any other governing entity of a school entity."HVAC." Heating, ventilation and air conditioning system."Parents' organization." An organized group, collective or agency of parents and legal guardians of the students in a school building or school entity."Radon." The radioactive noble gas radon 222."School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, private school or nonpublic school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0760PN0816 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223